Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
CHAPTER 4 Certiorari to Superior Court

Cross references.

Exercise of judicial power, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. I, Para. IV.

Procedure for appeals from decisions of superior court reviewing decisions of lower courts by certiorari, §

5-6-35

.

Description of extent of authority of superior court to exercise appellate jurisdiction and to exercise general supervision over all inferior tribunals, §

15-6-8

.

5-4-1.
When certiorari shall lie; exception.

The writ of certiorari shall lie for the correction of errors committed by any inferior judicatory or any person exercising judicial powers, including the judge of the probate court, except in cases touching the probate of wills, granting letters testamentary, and of administration.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, the writ of certiorari shall not lie in civil cases in the probate courts which are provided for by Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3957; Code 1868, § 3977; Code 1873, § 4049; Code 1882, § 4049; Civil Code 1895, § 4634; Civil Code 1910, § 5180; Code 1933, § 19-101; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

For survey of 1995 Eleventh Circuit cases on trial practice and procedure, see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 907 (1996).

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

For annual survey on local government law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2017).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2018).

5-4-2.
Petition for certiorari to probate judge generally.

When either party in any case in any probate court lodges objections to any proceeding or decision in the case, affecting the real merits of the case, the party making the same shall offer the objections in writing, which shall be signed by himself or his attorney and, if the same are overruled by the court, the party may petition the superior court for a writ of certiorari, in which petition he shall plainly, fully, and distinctly set forth the errors complained of. If the court deems the objections to be sufficient, it shall forthwith issue a writ of certiorari, directed to the judge of the probate court, requiring him to certify and send up to the superior court, at the time specified in the writ, all the proceedings in the case.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 523; Code 1863, § 3958; Code 1868, § 3978; Code 1873, § 4050; Code 1882, § 4050; Civil Code 1895, § 4635; Civil Code 1910, § 5181; Code 1933, § 19-201.

5-4-3.
Petition for certiorari to inferior judicatories generally.

When either party in any case in any inferior judicatory or before any person exercising judicial powers is dissatisfied with the decision or judgment in the case, the party may apply for and obtain a writ of certiorari by petition to the superior court for the county in which the case was tried, in which petition he shall plainly and distinctly set forth the errors complained of. On the filing of the petition in the office of the clerk of the superior court, with the sanction of the appropriate judge endorsed thereon, together with the bond or affidavit, as provided in Code Section 5-4-5, it shall be the duty of the clerk to issue a writ of certiorari, directed to the tribunal or person whose decision or judgment is the subject matter of complaint, requiring the tribunal or person to certify and send up all the proceedings in the case to the superior court, as directed in the writ of certiorari.

History.

Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 529; Code 1863, § 3960; Code 1868, § 3980; Code 1873, § 4052; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 153, § 7; Code 1882, § 4052; Civil Code 1895, § 4637; Civil Code 1910, § 5183; Code 1933, § 19-203.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

5-4-4.
Petition for certiorari in appeal case tried by jury in justice of the peace court generally.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-2, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 142, § 1; Code 1882, § 4157j; Civil Code 1895, § 4149; Civil Code 1910, § 4749; Code 1933, § 19-204.

5-4-5.
Bond and security required; certificate of payment of costs; oath of security; affidavit of indigence.

Before any writ of certiorari shall issue, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the party applying for the same, his agent, or his attorney shall give bond and good security, conditioned to pay the adverse party in the case the sums sought as an award to be recovered, together with all future costs, and shall also produce a certificate from the officer whose decision or judgment is the subject matter of complaint that all costs which may have accrued on the trial below have been paid. The bond and certificate shall be filed with the petition for certiorari, and security on the bond shall be liable as securities on appeal.

The person authorized to receive bond and security may compel the security tendered to swear upon oath the means by which he can fulfill the bond obligation. Such action shall exonerate from liability the person receiving the bond and security.

If the party applying for the writ of certiorari makes and files with his petition a written affidavit that he is advised and believes that he has good cause for certiorari to the superior court and that because of his indigence he is unable to pay the costs or give security, as the case may be, the affidavit shall in every respect answer instead of the certificate and bond above-mentioned.

History.

Laws 1811, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 523, 524; Code 1863, §§ 3962, 3963, 3964; Code 1868, §§ 3982, 3983, 3984; Code 1873, §§ 4054, 4055, 4056; Code 1882, §§ 4054, 4055, 4056; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4639, 4640, 4641; Ga. L. 1897, p. 33, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5185, 5186, 5187; Code 1933, §§ 19-206, 19-207, 19-208.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

5-4-6.
Time for application for writ; filing of petition; service of petition and writ.

All writs of certiorari shall be applied for within 30 days after the final determination of the case in which the error is alleged to have been committed. Applications made after 30 days are not timely and shall be dismissed by the court.

The certiorari petition and writ shall be filed in the clerk’s office within a reasonable time after sanction by the superior court judge; and a copy shall be served on the respondent, within five days after such filing, by the sheriff or his deputy or by the petitioner or his attorney. A copy of the petition and writ shall also be served on the opposite party or his counsel or other legal representative, in person or by mail; and service shall be shown by acknowledgment or by certificate of the counsel or person perfecting the service.

History.

Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 528; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 529; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 233, § 16; Ga. L. 1858, p. 88, § 1; Code 1863, §§ 2861, 3965; Code 1868, §§ 2869, 3985; Code 1873, §§ 2920, 4057; Code 1882, §§ 2920, 4057; Ga. L. 1889, p. 84, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3771, 4642; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4365, 5188; Ga. L. 1924, p. 59, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 19-209, 19-210; Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, §§ 2, 3.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

5-4-7.
Time for filing of answer; manner of service; effect of failure to perfect service.

The answer to the writ of certiorari shall be filed in the clerk’s office within 30 days after service thereof on the respondent unless further time is granted by the superior court. A copy of the answer shall be mailed or delivered to the petitioner by the respondent or by the clerk of the superior court. Failure to perfect service shall be grounds for continuance but shall not otherwise affect the validity of the proceedings.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3969; Code 1868, § 3989; Code 1873, § 4061; Code 1882, § 4061; Civil Code 1895, § 4646; Civil Code 1910, § 5195; Ga. L. 1918, p. 124, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 19-301; Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, § 5.

5-4-8.
Writing or dictation of answer by parties, attorneys, or interested persons; when verification required.

The answer shall not be written or dictated by either of the parties, or their attorneys, or any other person interested in the merits of the case. If made after the party making the same has retired from office, it shall be verified by affidavit.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3971; Code 1868, § 3991; Code 1873, § 4063; Code 1882, § 4063; Civil Code 1895, § 4648; Civil Code 1910, § 5197; Code 1933, § 19-303.

5-4-9.
Filing of traverse or exception to answer; perfection of answer.

The petitioner or defendant in certiorari may traverse or except to the answer of the respondent, which exceptions or traverse shall be filed in writing, specifying the defects, within 15 days after the filing of the answer; and, if the traverse or exceptions are sustained, the answer shall be perfected as directed by the court.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3970; Code 1868, § 3990; Code 1873, § 4062; Code 1882, § 4062; Civil Code 1895, § 4647; Civil Code 1910, § 5196; Code 1933, § 19-302; Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, § 6.

5-4-10.
Amendment of petition, bond, answer, and traverse.

Certiorari proceedings shall be amendable at any stage, as to matters of form or substance, as to the petition, bond, answer, and traverse; and a valid bond may by amendment be substituted for a void bond or no bond at all.

History.

Code 1933, § 19-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, § 9.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

5-4-11.
Conduct of hearing generally; trial by jury.

Certiorari cases shall be heard by the court without a jury, in chambers or in open court, upon reasonable notice to the parties, at any time that the matters may be ready for hearing.

Where a traverse to the answer has been filed and jury trial demanded, the matter may be tried at any time a jury is available therefor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3972; Code 1868, § 3992; Code 1873, § 4064; Code 1882, § 4064; Civil Code 1895, § 4649; Civil Code 1910, § 5198; Code 1933, § 19-401; Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, § 7.

5-4-12.
Grounds of error considered generally; scope of review; technical distinctions abolished.

No ground of error shall be considered which is not distinctly set forth in the petition.

The scope of review shall be limited to all errors of law and determination as to whether the judgment or ruling below was sustained by substantial evidence.

All technical distinctions as to what questions will be considered, such as questions concerning judgments absolutely void or assignments of error drawing in question the legal constitution or jurisdiction of the tribunal below, are abolished.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3973; Code 1868, § 3993; Code 1873, § 4065; Code 1882, § 4065; Civil Code 1895, § 4650; Civil Code 1910, § 5199; Code 1933, § 19-402; Ga. L. 1961, p. 190, § 8.

5-4-13.
Grant of writ for failure to prove venue or time of criminal offense.

No judge of a superior court shall grant a writ of certiorari or sustain the writ in a criminal or quasi-criminal case on the ground that the venue was not proved in the trial court or that the time of the commission of the offense was not proved, unless there is a distinct allegation in the petition for the writ of failure to prove the venue or time and an allegation of error as to such matters.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 149, § 1; Code 1933, § 19-404.

5-4-14.
Dismissal or return of writ to lower court with instructions; entry by superior court of final decision where no questions of fact involved.

Upon the hearing of a writ of certiorari, the superior court may order the same to be dismissed or may return the same to the court from which it came with instructions.

In all cases when the error complained of is an error in law which must finally govern the case, and the court is satisfied that there is no question of fact involved which makes it necessary to send the case back for a new hearing before the tribunal below, it shall be the duty of the judge of the superior court to make a final decision in the case without sending it back to the tribunal below.

History.

Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 529; Code 1863, § 3975; Code 1868, § 3995; Code 1873, § 4067; Code 1882, § 4067; Civil Code 1895, § 4652; Civil Code 1910, § 5201; Code 1933, § 19-501.

5-4-15.
Requirement of new trial when writ not answered.

In all cases pending in the superior courts upon certiorari from any inferior judicatory or any person exercising judicial powers, if the judge or other officer before whom the case was tried dies before answering the writ of certiorari or answers that he cannot or does not remember or recollect what occurred at the trial of the case and he therefore cannot or does not make answer to the same, it shall be the duty of the judge who granted the writ of certiorari forthwith to order a new trial of the case in the court below.

History.

Ga. L. 1861, p. 63, § 1; Code 1868, § 3996; Code 1873, § 4068; Code 1882, § 4068; Civil Code 1895, § 4653; Ga. L. 1899, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5202; Code 1933, § 19-502; Ga. L. 1933, p. 113, § 1.

5-4-16.
Recovery of costs by plaintiff where certiorari sustained; recovery of costs by plaintiff where certiorari returned to lower court for new trial.

If after the hearing the certiorari is sustained and a final decision thereon is made by the superior court, the plaintiff may have judgment entered for the amount recovered by him in the court below, the costs paid to obtain the certiorari, and the costs in the superior court. If the certiorari is returned to the court below for a new hearing, the plaintiff shall have judgment entered for the costs in the superior court only, leaving the costs paid to obtain the certiorari to be awarded upon the final trial below.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3977; Code 1868, § 3998; Code 1873, § 4070; Code 1882, § 4070; Civil Code 1895, § 4655; Civil Code 1910, § 5204; Code 1933, § 19-504.

5-4-17.
Recovery of costs by defendant generally.

If the certiorari is dismissed and a final decision is made in the case by the superior court, the defendant in certiorari may have judgment entered in the superior court against the plaintiff and his security for the sum recovered by him, together with the costs in the superior court; and if the case is sent back to the court below, and there is a judgment in the case in favor of the defendant in the court below the security on the certiorari bond shall then be included as in case of security on appeal.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3978; Code 1868, § 3999; Code 1873, § 4071; Code 1882, § 4071; Civil Code 1895, § 4656; Civil Code 1910, § 5205; Code 1933, § 19-505.

5-4-18.
Recovery of damages for frivolous certiorari.

If it shall be made to appear that a certiorari was frivolous and was applied for without good cause or only for the purpose of delay, the presiding judge before whom the writ was heard, on motion of the opposite party, may order that damages totaling not more than 20 percent of the sum adjudged to be due be recovered by the defendant in certiorari against the plaintiff in certiorari and his security; and judgment may be entered and execution issued accordingly.

History.

Ga. L. 1857, p. 104, § 2; Code 1863, § 3976; Code 1868, § 3997; Code 1873, § 4069; Code 1882, § 4069; Civil Code 1895, § 4654; Civil Code 1910, § 5203; Code 1933, § 19-503.

5-4-19.
Operation of writ of certiorari as supersedeas in civil cases.

The writ of certiorari, when granted in civil cases, shall operate as a supersedeas of the judgment until the final hearing in the superior court.

History.

Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 529; Code 1863, § 3968; Code 1868, § 3988; Code 1873, § 4060; Code 1882, § 4060; Civil Code 1895, § 4645; Civil Code 1910, § 5191; Code 1933, § 19-213.

5-4-20.
Supersedeas of criminal conviction; bond; affidavit of indigence; effect of supersedeas.

Any person who has been convicted of any criminal or quasi-criminal offense or violation of any ordinance, in any inferior judicatory by whatever name called, except constitutional city courts or state courts, exercising criminal or quasi-criminal jurisdiction, who desires a writ of certiorari to review and correct the judgment of conviction in the case shall be entitled to a supersedeas of the judgment if he files with the clerk of the court, or, if there is no clerk, with the judge thereof, or with the commissioners if it is a court presided over by commissioners with no clerk, a bond payable to the state, or, if the conviction is in a municipal court, payable to the municipality, in amount and with security acceptable to and to be approved by the clerk, judge, or majority of the commissioners, as the case may be, conditioned that the defendant will personally appear and abide the final judgment, order, or sentence upon him in the case. The bond, if payable to the state, may be forfeited in the same manner as any other criminal bond in any court having jurisdiction. If the bond is payable to the municipal corporation, it may be forfeited according to the procedure prescribed in the municipal ordinance or charter. Alternatively, an action may be brought on the bond in any court having jurisdiction. Upon the giving of bond the defendant shall be released from custody in like manner as defendants are released upon supersedeas bonds in criminal cases where a notice of appeal has been filed.

If the defendant is unable because of his indigence to give bond and makes this fact appear by affidavit to be filed with the judge, clerk, or commissioners, as the case may be, the same shall operate as a supersedeas of the judgment; provided, however, that the defendant shall not be set at liberty unless he gives bond as prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The supersedeas provided for in this Code section shall operate to suspend the judgment of conviction until the case is finally heard and determined by the superior court to which it is taken by certiorari or by the Court of Appeals upon appeal, provided that within the time prescribed by law the defendant shall apply for and procure the writs and remedies provided by law for reviewing the judgment complained of. The supersedeas shall be equally applicable whether the judge of the superior court to whom the petition for certiorari is presented sanctions it or refuses it, provided that within the time provided by law the defendant diligently files a notice of appeal.

The object of this Code section is to provide a method by which a defendant may obtain a supersedeas so long as he is prosecuting or is entitled under the law to prosecute the proceeding brought or to be brought to review the conviction of which he is complaining, or any intermediate appellate judgment rendered thereon, in order that the defendant shall not be deprived of his right to apply to the courts by being compelled to serve his sentence or pay a fine before he has had the full opportunity allowed him by law of taking the necessary proceedings to correct and review his conviction.

History.

Ga. L. 1902, p. 105, § 1; Ga. L. 1909, p. 148, §§ 1-3; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5192, 5193, 5194; Code 1933, §§ 19-214, 19-215, 19-216; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 5.

Cross references.

Bonds and recognizances generally, T. 17, C. 6.